Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1380.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(d) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 302. Forests.* * *(d) Chief Forest Fire Warden.--The Chief Forest Fire Warden, subject to the approval of the secretary, shall have the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 following powers and duties to:* * *(13) Submit an annual report no later than March 1 of each calendar year to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives, which shall include the following information:(i) Activities carried out under fire resource plans in the previous calendar year.(ii) The amount and locations of wildfires in this Commonwealth in the previous calendar year.(iii) Actions taken by the Chief Forest Fire Warden or local forest fire wardens to prevent wildfires in this Commonwealth in the previous calendar year.(iv) The amount and locations of prescribed or controlled burns carried out in this Commonwealth BY THE DEPARTMENT AND ANY OTHER ENTITY AND ANY INFORMATION RELATING TO CONTROLLED BURNS THAT HAS BEEN SHARED WITH THE DEPARTMENT in the previous calendar year. (v) The estimated Statewide manpower for combating wildfires, including an active list of firefighters THE NUMBER OF FIREFIGHTERS ORGANIZED BY OR LOCATED IN A FOREST DISTRICT TO BE submitted by local forest fire 20250HB1380PN2707 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wardens in the previous calendar year.(vi) A list of on-hand equipment for combating wildfires submitted by local forest fire wardens in the previous calendar year. AN AGGREGATED LIST OF EQUIPMENT USED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION TO BE SUBMITTED BY EACH LOCAL FOREST DISTRICT IN THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1380PN2707 - 3 - <--<--123456789